Hawaii statutes.
§486-81 Confiscation of evidence. The
administrator or any authorized inspector may confiscate as evidence any tools
designed to change, manipulate, or otherwise alter the display of an odometer,
when the inspector has reason to believe that such tools may be used in an
illicit manner or by persons other than licensed dealers, or licensed repair
agencies, or by persons gainfully employed by such agencies or dealers. [L
1988, c 156, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next